District of Columbia statutes.
36-203

Penalties.

A person violating any of the provisions of § 36-202 shall be guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not less than $100 nor more than $500, or by imprisonment for not less than 3 months nor more than 1 year, or by both such fine and imprisonment.

Feb. 18, 1932, 47 Stat. 51, ch. 47, § 3
Deceptive imitation of goods, criminal penalty, see § 22-1502.
1981 Ed., § 48-403.
1973 Ed., § 48-403.